test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-iiqtistw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - īʼtistõ: # Verb 54 'eng /est ühtlustada/fin' - full paradigm
     īʼtistõ+V+Inf: [īʼtistõ, ītistõ]
     īʼtistõ+V+Ger: [īʼtistõs, ītistõs]
     īʼtistõ+V+Sup: [īʼtistõm, ītistõm]
     īʼtistõ+V+Sup+Ine: [īʼtistõmõs, ītistõmõs]
     īʼtistõ+V+Sup+Ela: [īʼtistõmõst, ītistõmõst]
     īʼtistõ+V+Sup+Tra: [īʼtistõmõks, ītistõmõks]
     īʼtistõ+V+Sup+Abe: [īʼtistõmõt, ītistõmõt]
     īʼtistõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [īʼtistõb, ītistõb]
     īʼtistõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [īʼtistõt, ītistõt]
     īʼtistõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [īʼtistõbõd, ītistõbõd]
     īʼtistõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [īʼtistiz, ītistiz]
     īʼtistõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [[īʼtistizt, īʼtistiztõ], [ītistizt, īʼtistiztõ]]
     īʼtistõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [[īʼtistizt, īʼtistiztõ], [ītistizt, īʼtistiztõ]]
     īʼtistõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [īʼtist, ītist]
     īʼtistõ+V+Cond+Sg3: [īʼtistõks, ītistõks]
     īʼtistõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [īʼtist, ītist]
     īʼtistõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [īʼtist, ītist]
     īʼtistõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [īʼtistõgid, ītistõgid]
     īʼtistõ+V+Jus+Sg3: [īʼtistõg, ītistõg]
     īʼtistõ+V+Quo+Sg3: [īʼtistiji, ītistiji]
     īʼtistõ+V+ActPrfPrc: [īʼtistõn, ītistõn]
     īʼtistõ+V+PssPrfPrc: [īʼtistõd, ītistõd]
